Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.33.125

Limitation on expenditures—Void.

Liabilities incurred by any officer or employee of the city in excess of any budget appropriations shall not be a liability of the city. The clerk shall issue no warrant and the city council or other authorized person shall approve no claim for an expenditure in excess of the total amount appropriated for any individual fund, except upon an order of a court of competent jurisdiction or for emergencies as provided in this chapter.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 81 s 4; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.33.125.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 81: See note following RCW 35A.13.035.